Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB63.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Consent" means the consent to transmission of a deep fake to a specific
recipient or recipients;
(b) "Deep fake" means any video recording, motion picture film, audio
recording, electronic image, or photograph:
1. That appears to authentically depict any speech or conduct of an
individual who did not in fact engage in such speech or conduct;
2. That is so realistic that a reasonable person would believe it depicts
speech or conduct of an individual who did not in fact engage in such
speech or conduct;
3. That does not contain adequate labeling or disclaimers such that a
reasonable person would understand that it is not real speech or
conduct; and
4. The production of which was substantially dependent upon technical
means, rather than the ability of another individual to physically or
verbally impersonate such individual;
(c) "Depicted individual" means an individual who, by means of digital
manipulation, appears in whole or in part in a deep fake and who is
identifiable by virtue of the person's face, likeness, voice, or other
distinguishing characteristic;
(d) "Information content provider" means any person or entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for the creation or development of
information provided through the internet or any other interactive computer
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 15
service; and
(e) "Interactive computer service" means any information service, system, or
access software provider that provides or enables computer access by
multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a service or
system that provides access to the internet and such services offered or
systems operated by libraries or educational institutions.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any natural person to willfully and knowingly
disseminate a deep fake of a depicted individual without the express, written
consent of the depicted individual.
(3) Any natural person who violates subsection (2) of this section shall be personally
liable for:
(a) Appropriate injunctive relief;
(b) Actual damages;
(c) Punitive damages;
(d) Court costs; and
(e) Reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) A claim brought pursuant to this section may be asserted in any court of
competent jurisdiction.
(5) Consent to the creation of a deep fake does not, by itself, constitute consent to its
distribution.
(6) A person shall not be found liable under this section when:
(a) The dissemination is made for the purpose of a criminal investigation or
prosecution that is otherwise lawful;
(b) The dissemination is for the purpose of, or in connection with, the reporting
of unlawful conduct;
(c) The dissemination is made in the course of seeking or receiving medical or
mental health treatment, and the image is protected from further
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 15
dissemination;
(d) The deep fake was obtained in a commercial setting for the purpose of the
legal sale of goods or services, including the creation, dissemination, or
distribution of artistic works for sale or display, and the depicted individual
knew, or should have known, that a deep fake would be created and
disseminated;
(e) The deep fake relates to a matter of public interest and dissemination serves
a lawful public purpose;
(f) The dissemination is for legitimate scientific research or educational
purposes;
(g) The dissemination is made for legal proceedings and is:
1. Consistent with common practice in civil proceedings necessary for
the proper functioning of the judicial system; or
2. Protected by a court order which prohibits any further dissemination;
or
(h) The deep fake was made for the purpose of parody, satire, or entertainment
and includes a disclosure that:
1. States that the material containing the deep fake does not accurately
represent the speech or conduct of the person portrayed; and
2. Is made in the following manner:
a. For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall be clear,
conspicuous, and in a prominent location; or
b. If the media consists of audio only and a visual disclosure is not
feasible, the disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner
and in a pitch that can be easily heard by the average listener, at
the beginning of the audio and the end of the audio.
(7) A provider or user of an interactive computer service shall not be treated as the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 15
publisher or speaker of any information provided by another information content
provider.
(8) This section shall not be construed to impose liability on an interactive computer
service when acting in its capacity as a provider of those services.
(9) This section shall not be construed to alter or negate any rights, obligations, or
immunities of an interactive computer service provider under 47 U.S.C. sec. 230.
(10) This section shall not apply to:
(a) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
television operator, programmer, or producer, that broadcasts material
containing deep fakes prohibited by this section as part of a bona fide
newscast, news interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot coverage of a
bona fide news event, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges through context
or a disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by the average
listener or viewer, that there are questions about the authenticity of the
audio or visual media containing the deep fakes;
(b) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
television operator, programmer, or producer, when it is paid to broadcast
material containing deep fakes; or
(c) A website or a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other periodical
of general circulation, including an internet or electronic publication, that
routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, and that
publishes material containing deep fakes prohibited by this section, if the
publication clearly states that the material containing the deep fake does not
accurately represent the speech or conduct of the person portrayed in the
deceptive audio or visual media.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 413 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 15
An action filed pursuant to Section 1 of this Act shall be commenced within three (3)
years after the cause of action accrued.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 519 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Deep fake" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act; and
(b) "Depicted individual" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) A natural person is guilty of disseminating a deep fake when he or she discloses
or threatens to disclose a deep fake that has not been previously disclosed to the
public:
(a) With the intent to harass, threaten, alarm, or cause substantial harm to the
finances or reputation of the depicted individual;
(b) With actual knowledge or reckless disregard for whether such disclosure or
threatened disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or
economic harm to the depicted individual; or
(c) Whose creation, reproduction, or distribution could be reasonably expected
to affect the conduct of any administrative, legislative, or judicial
proceeding, including the administration or outcome of an election.
(3) Disseminating a deep fake is a Class D felony.
(4) A person is not guilty of disseminating a deep fake if any of the conditions set
forth in subsection (6) of Section 1 of this Act are met.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 10/13/2025 1:35 PM Jacketed